ASPELL6/portugues/pt_PT.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY aerisontcdmlupvgbfzáhçqjíxãóéêâúõACMPSBTELGRIFVDkHJONôywUKXZWQÁYÍÉàÓèÂÚ


PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0              anti           [^hirs]

PFX S Y 2
PFX S   0              des            [^h]
PFX S   h              des            h

PFX I Y 4
PFX I   0              in             [^plmr]
PFX I   0              im             p
PFX I   0              i              [lm]
PFX I   0              ir             r

PFX R Y 2
PFX R   0              re             [^s]
PFX R   0              res            s

PFX u Y 1
PFX u   0              sub            [^bhr]

PFX F Y 3
PFX F   0              ultra          .
PFX F   0              super          .
PFX F   0              hiper          .

SFX T Y 6
SFX T   0              bi             .
SFX T   0              tris           s
SFX T   0              tri            [^s]
SFX T   0              tetra          .
SFX T   0              penta          .
SFX T   0              hexa           .

SFX p Y 14
SFX p   0              s              [^Ã][^lsmrnzx]
SFX p   0              s              Ãe
SFX p   0              0              Ão
SFX p   l              is             al
SFX p   0              0ol            ol
SFX p   0              0el            [^v]el
SFX p   l              is             [ÁÉÍÓÚ]vel
SFX p   l              s              il
SFX p   0              es             [^ÁÉÊ]s
SFX p   0              0              Ás
SFX p   0              0              És
SFX p   0              0              Ês
SFX p   m              ns             m
SFX p   0              es             [rnzx]

SFX a Y 4
SFX a   0              s              Ão
SFX a   il             eis            il
SFX a   os             as             entos
SFX a   0              s              [^aeiou]

SFX e Y 2
SFX e   o              es             Ão
SFX e   0              es             al

SFX f Y 12
SFX f   o              a              [^Ã]o
SFX f   o              as             [^Ã]o
SFX f   0              a              [^aeiouscn]
SFX f   0              as             [^aeiouscn]
SFX f   0              a              [^Ê]s
SFX f   0              as             [^Ê]s
SFX f   0              0              Ês
SFX f   0              0              Ês
SFX f   0              0              Ão
SFX f   0              0              Ão
SFX f   e              a              e
SFX f   e              as             e

SFX b Y 4
SFX b   o              0              Ão
SFX b   o              s              Ão
SFX b   0              ssa            e
SFX b   0              ssas           e

SFX g Y 2
SFX g   0              0              Ão
SFX g   0              0              Ão

SFX m Y 5
SFX m   o              amente         o
SFX m   0              amente         u
SFX m   0              mente          [^v][^q][^uo]
SFX m   0              0              Ável
SFX m   0              0              Ível

SFX H Y 36
SFX H   0              amente         dor
SFX H   0              0              Ório
SFX H   0              0              Ário
SFX H   0              0              Ático
SFX H   0              0              Áctico
SFX H   0              0              Ónico
SFX H   0              0              Ógico
SFX H   0              0              Ífero
SFX H   0              0              Ético
SFX H   0              0              Ístico
SFX H   0              0              Íssimo
SFX H   0              0              Ítico
SFX H   0              0              Áfico
SFX H   0              0              Étrico
SFX H   0              0              Ómico
SFX H   0              0              Érico
SFX H   0              0              Ótico
SFX H   0              0              Áceo
SFX H   0              0              Ástico
SFX H   0              0              Ício
SFX H   0              0              Ífico
SFX H   0              0              Íaco
SFX H   0              0              Ólico
SFX H   0              0              Órico
SFX H   0              0              Énico
SFX H   0              0              Ódico
SFX H   0              0              Ópico
SFX H   0              0              Álico
SFX H   0              0              Érmico
SFX H   0              0              Ívoro
SFX H   0              0              Ábico
SFX H   0              0              Ófilo
SFX H   0              0              Élico
SFX H   0              0              Émico
SFX H   0              0              Ónio
SFX H   0              0              Ásico

SFX q Y 32
SFX q   0              0ologia        logia
SFX q   0              0ologia        logia
SFX q   0              0ologia        logia
SFX q   0              0ologia        logia
SFX q   0              0afia          afia
SFX q   0              0afia          afia
SFX q   0              0afia          afia
SFX q   0              0afia          afia
SFX q   0              0omania        mania
SFX q   0              0omania        mania
SFX q   0              0omania        mania
SFX q   0              0omania        mania
SFX q   0              0ofobia        fobia
SFX q   0              0ofobia        fobia
SFX q   0              0ofobia        fobia
SFX q   0              0ofobia        fobia
SFX q   0              0ofilia        filia
SFX q   0              0ofilia        filia
SFX q   0              0ofilia        filia
SFX q   0              0ofilia        filia
SFX q   0              0              cÍdio
SFX q   0              0              cÍdio
SFX q   ia             a              patia
SFX q   ia             as             patia
SFX q   ura            or             cultura
SFX q   ura            ora            cultura
SFX q   ura            ores           cultura
SFX q   ura            oras           cultura
SFX q   cia            ta             cracia
SFX q   cia            tas            cracia
SFX q   smo            sta            eÍsmo
SFX q   smo            stas           eÍsmo

SFX r Y 46
SFX r   0              0ogia          logia
SFX r   0              0ogia          logia
SFX r   0              0ogia          logia
SFX r   0              0ogia          logia
SFX r   0              0ografia       ografia
SFX r   0              0ografia       ografia
SFX r   0              0ografia       ografia
SFX r   0              0ografia       ografia
SFX r   0              0omia          nomia
SFX r   0              0omia          nomia
SFX r   0              0omia          nomia
SFX r   0              0omia          nomia
SFX r   0              0ia            mania
SFX r   0              0ia            mania
SFX r   0              0ia            mania
SFX r   0              0ia            mania
SFX r   0              0acia          cracia
SFX r   0              0acia          cracia
SFX r   0              0acia          cracia
SFX r   0              0acia          cracia
SFX r   0              0icultura      cultura
SFX r   0              0icultura      cultura
SFX r   0              0arquia        arquia
SFX r   0              0arquia        arquia
SFX r   0              0arquia        arquia
SFX r   0              0arquia        arquia
SFX r   0              0obia          fobia
SFX r   0              0obia          fobia
SFX r   0              0obia          fobia
SFX r   0              0obia          fobia
SFX r   0              0atia          patia
SFX r   0              0atia          patia
SFX r   0              0atia          patia
SFX r   0              0atia          patia
SFX r   0              0etria         metria
SFX r   0              0etria         metria
SFX r   0              0etria         metria
SFX r   0              0etria         metria
SFX r   0              0orfia         morfia
SFX r   0              0orfia         morfia
SFX r   0              0orfia         morfia
SFX r   0              0orfia         morfia
SFX r   morfismo       m              morfismo
SFX r   morfismo       m              morfismo
SFX r   morfismo       m              morfismo
SFX r   morfismo       m              morfismo

SFX s Y 36
SFX s   0              0o             [^cÇg]o
SFX s   co             qu             co
SFX s   0              0              Ço
SFX s   go             gu             go
SFX s   0              0e             e
SFX s   0                             [lr]
SFX s   0              0              Ês
SFX s   z              c              z
SFX s   0              0              Ável
SFX s   0              0o             [^cÇg]o
SFX s   co             qu             co
SFX s   0              0              Ço
SFX s   go             gu             go
SFX s   0              0e             e
SFX s   0                             [lr]
SFX s   0              0              Ês
SFX s   z              c              z
SFX s   0              0              Ável
SFX s   0              0o             [^cÇg]o
SFX s   co             qu             co
SFX s   0              0              Ço
SFX s   go             gu             go
SFX s   0              0e             e
SFX s   0                             [lr]
SFX s   0              0              Ês
SFX s   z              c              z
SFX s   0              0              Ável
SFX s   0              0o             [^cÇg]o
SFX s   co             qu             co
SFX s   0              0              Ço
SFX s   go             gu             go
SFX s   0              0e             e
SFX s   0                             [lr]
SFX s   0              0              Ês
SFX s   z              c              z
SFX s   0              0              Ável

SFX d Y 22
SFX d   o              idade          [^Çg]o
SFX d   0              0              Ço
SFX d   go             guidade        go
SFX d   e              idade          e
SFX d   0              idade          r
SFX d   0              idade          [^v][^q]l
SFX d   vel            bilidade       [^ÁÍÚ]vel
SFX d   0              0              Ável
SFX d   0              0              Ível
SFX d   0              0              Úvel
SFX d   z              cidade         z
SFX d   o              idades         [^Çg]o
SFX d   0              0              Ço
SFX d   go             guidades       go
SFX d   e              idades         e
SFX d   0              idades         r
SFX d   0              idades         [^v][^q]l
SFX d   vel            bilidades      [^ÁÍ]vel
SFX d   0              0              Ável
SFX d   0              0              Ível
SFX d   0              0              Úvel
SFX d   z              cidades        z

SFX i Y 24
SFX i   o              ismo           [^cÇÃ]o
SFX i   co             quismo         co
SFX i   0              0              Ço
SFX i   0              0              ÇÃo
SFX i   a              ismo           [^icg]a
SFX i   a              smo            ia
SFX i   ca             quismo         ca
SFX i   ga             guismo         ga
SFX i   e              ismo           e
SFX i   0              ismo           [lr]
SFX i   0              0              Ês
SFX i   m              nismo          m
SFX i   o              ismos          [^cÇÃ]o
SFX i   co             quismos        co
SFX i   0              0              Ço
SFX i   0              0              ÇÃo
SFX i   a              ismos          [^icg]a
SFX i   a              smos           ia
SFX i   ca             quismos        ca
SFX i   ga             guismos        ga
SFX i   e              ismos          e
SFX i   0              ismos          [lr]
SFX i   0              0              Ês
SFX i   m              nismos         m
